apertium-eng-kaz.eng.dix
    <pardef n="probj__prn">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>me</l>
        <r>I<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>you</l>
        <r>you<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="yes">
      <p>
        <l>you<b/>all</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>y'all</l>
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>him</l>
        <r>he<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>her</l>
        <r>she<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>it</l>
        <r>it<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>us</l>
        <r>we<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>them</l>
        <r>they<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="probj_dem__prn">

                            <e i="">
        <i/>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l><b/>me</l>
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l><b/>you</l>
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l><b/>him</l>
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l><b/>her</l>
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l><b/>it</l>
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l><b/>us</l>
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l><b/>them</l>
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l><b/>this</l>
        <r><j/>this<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l><b/>these</l>
        <r><j/>this<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l><b/>that</l>
        <r><j/>that<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l><b/>those</l>
        <r><j/>that<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pos_as_probj_dem_sg__prn">

                            <e i="">
        <i/>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l><b/>my</l>
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l><b/>your</l>
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l><b/>his</l>
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l><b/>her</l>
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l><b/>its</l>
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l><b/>this</l>
        <r><j/>this<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l><b/>that</l>
        <r><j/>that<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pos_as_probj_dem_pl__prn">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l><b/>our</l>
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="yes">
      <p>
        <l><b/>our</l>
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l><b/>their</l>
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l><b/>these</l>
        <r><j/>this<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l><b/>those</l>
        <r><j/>that<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>



    <pardef n="ouml">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ö</l>
        <r>ö</r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>oe</l>
        <r>ö</r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="uuml">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ü</l>
        <r>ü</r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ue</l>
        <r>ü</r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>


 
   
    <pardef n="o_ou">

                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ou</l>
        <r>ou</r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>o</l>
        <r>ou</r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="RL" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ou</l>
        <r>ou</r>
      </p>
    </e>


    

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="z_s">

                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>z</l>
        <r>s</r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
        <i>s</i>
    </e>


    

                            <e r="RL" i="">
        <i>s</i>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="e_ae">

                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ae</l>
        <r>ae</r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>ae</r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="RL" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ae</l>
        <r>ae</r>
      </p>
    </e>


    

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="l_ll">

                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ll</l>
        <r>ll</r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>l</l>
        <r>ll</r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="RL" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ll</l>
        <r>ll</r>
      </p>
    </e>


    

    </pardef>

                            <e lm="pronoms personals d'objecte" i=""><i/><par n="probj__prn"/></e>
                            <e lm="Jürgen Trumpf" i=""><i>J</i><par n="uuml"/><i>rgen<b/>Trumpf</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
                            <e lm="Jürgen" i=""><i>J</i><par n="uuml"/><i>rgen</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
                            <e lm="Tönis" i=""><i>T</i><par n="ouml"/><i>nis</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
                            <e lm="Pöttering" i=""><i>P</i><par n="ouml"/><i>ttering</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
                            <e i=""><i>D</i><par n="ouml"/><i>rler</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
			    <e lm="anaemic" i=""><i>an</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>mic</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="anaesthesia" i=""><i>an</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>sthesia</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="favouritism" i=""><i>fav</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>ritism</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="feces" i=""><i>f</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>ces</i><par n="alms__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="palaeontologist" i=""><i>pal</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>ontologist</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="organisational" i=""><i>organi</i><par n="z_s"/><i>ational</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
                            <e lm="favourite" i=""><i>fav</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>rite</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
                            <e lm="marvellous" i=""><i>marve</i><par n="l_ll"/><i>ous</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
                            <e lm="wall in" i=""><i>wall</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>in</l><r><g><b/>in</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="fly" i=""><i>fl</i><par n="fl/y__vblex"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>away</l><r><g><b/>away</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="pronoms personals d'objecte" i=""><i/><par n="probj__prn"/></e>
                            <e lm="Jürgen Trumpf" i=""><i>J</i><par n="uuml"/><i>rgen<b/>Trumpf</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
                            <e lm="Jürgen" i=""><i>J</i><par n="uuml"/><i>rgen</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
                            <e lm="Tönis" i=""><i>T</i><par n="ouml"/><i>nis</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
                            <e lm="Pöttering" i=""><i>P</i><par n="ouml"/><i>ttering</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
                            <e lm="behaviourism" i=""><i>behavi</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>rism</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="crystallise" i=""><i>crysta</i><par n="l_ll"/><i>i</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="encyclopaedia" i=""><i>encyclop</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>dia</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="glamorous" i=""><i>glam</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>rous</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
                            <e lm="World Health Organisation" i=""><i>World<b/>Health<b/>Organi</i><par n="z_s"/><i>ation</i><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
                            <e lm="colonizing" i=""><i>coloni</i><par n="z_s"/><i>ing</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
                            <e lm="fire off" i=""><i>fir</i><par n="liv/e__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>off</l><r><g><b/>off</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="populariser" i=""><i>populari</i><par n="z_s"/><i>er</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="saviour" i=""><i>savi</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>r</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="travelling" i=""><i>trave</i><par n="l_ll"/><i>ing</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
                            <e lm="travelling saleswoman" i=""><i>trave</i><par n="l_ll"/><i>ing<b/>saleswoman</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="churn up" i=""><i>churn</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="installment" i=""><i>insta</i><par n="l_ll"/><i>ment</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
                            <e lm="unauthorized" i=""><i>unauthori</i><par n="z_s"/><i>ed</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
                            <e lm="dig up" i=""><i>d</i><par n="d/ig__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
